District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.85

Two-year report of domestic and foreign corporations — Effect of failure to pay or file.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 298, Pub. L. 87-569, § 85
Sept. 8, 1995, D.C. Law 11-42, § 2(c), 42 DCR 3285
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 30, 43 DCR 530
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-301.85.
1981 Ed., § 29-586.
1973 Ed., § 29-1085.